Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3513
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any natural person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, or association.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 192.